Tennessee, session 114, SB1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-903, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (f):
(1) Notwithstanding this section, § 8-35-109, or another law to the contrary, the
board of trustees shall convert a person's participation in the retirement system, for
service as a member of the general assembly and as a participant in the hybrid plan,
from the hybrid plan to the legacy plan upon the person completing ten (10) years of
service as a member of the general assembly if the person became a member of the
general assembly on or after July 1, 2014. The board shall provide written notification to
the member after the conversion from the hybrid plan to the legacy plan is completed.
(2) The office of legislative administration shall notify the board of trustees upon
a member of the general assembly completing ten (10) years of service as a member of
the general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to persons completing ten (10) years of service as a member of the general assembly
on or after July 1, 2024.
SB1416
000101
- 1 -